Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-819
Hearing; procedure.

The hearing shall be conducted informally as a conference or series of conferences to effect a reconciliation of the spouses or an amicable adjustment or settlement of the issues of the controversy. To facilitate and promote the purposes of sections 42-801 to 42-823, the court may, with the consent of both of the parties to the proceeding, recommend or invoke the aid of physicians, psychiatrists, endocrinologists, or other specialists or scientific experts, or of the pastor or director of any religious denomination to which the parties may belong. Such aid shall not be at the expense of the court or of the county unless the board of county commissioners specifically provides and authorizes such aid.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 19, p. 660.